Utah statutes.
13-5b-103.   Contract negotiation standards.
(1)  An integrated health system shall prohibit any employee or independent
contractor of any division, subsidiary, or affiliate engaged in the business
of health insurance from negotiating contracts on behalf of the integrated
health care system's health care facilities, subject to licensing under Title
26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act, with any
other licensed health insurer in the state.
(2)  An integrated health system shall prohibit the disclosure of contract
pricing terms between the integrated health care system's health care
facilities and other health insurers with the integrated health care system's
divisions, subsidiaries, or affiliates which are engaged in the business of
health insurance.
